Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201271-7909
Peer review, defined.

Peer review
means the procedure by which health care providers evaluate the quality and
efficiency of services ordered or performed by other health care providers,
including practice analysis, inpatient hospital and extended care facility
utilization review, medical audit, ambulatory care review, root cause analysis,
claims review, underwriting assistance, and the compliance of a hospital,
nursing home, or other health care facility operated by a health care provider
with the standards set by an association of health care providers and with
applicable laws, rules, and regulations.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 6.